errortag-src/numeral-sme-lex.txt
LEXICON GOLBMANUPPELOHKAI
 +Num+Sg+Nom:%>#nuppe#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Ess:%>#nuppe#lohki%>n K ;
 +Num+Ess:%>#nuppe#logi%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:%>#nuppe#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:%>X4#nuppe#logi%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:%>X4#nuppe#logi»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Attr:%>X4#nuppe#lot»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Attr:%>X4#nuppe#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:%>X4#nuppe#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:%>n#nuppe#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:%>X5jn#nuppe#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:%>X4#nuppe#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:%>X4#nuppe#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:%>n#nuppe#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:%>X5jn#nuppe#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc:%>X4#nuppe#logi%>s K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:%>X4#nuppe#logi%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:%>#nuppe#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:%>X4#nuppe#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:%>X5jn#nuppe#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:%>#nuppe#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:%>#nuppe#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:%>#nuppe#logi%>jde K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:%>X5jn#nuppe#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:%>#nuppe#logi%>jgujn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:%>#nuppe#logi%>jn K ; !Nickel 91 from here downwards
 +Num+Pl+Attr:%>X4t#nuppe#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Attr:%>X5jd#nuppe#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Attr:%>X5jn#nuppe#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Nom:%>X4t#nuppe#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:%>X5jd#nuppe#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen+Use/Sub:%>X5jd#nuppe#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Use/Sub:%>X5jd#nuppe#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Pl+Com+Use/Sub:%>X5jd#nuppe#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Ess:%>X4t#nuppe#logi%>n K ;


LEXICON GOLBMAGOALMMATLOHKAI
 +Num+Sg+Nom:%>#goalmmát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Ess:%>#goalmmát#lohki%>n K ;
 +Num+Ess:%>#goalmmát#logi%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:%>#goalmmát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:%>X4#goalmmát#logi%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:%>X4#goalmmát#logi»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Attr:%>X4#goalmmát#lot»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Attr:%>X4#goalmmát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:%>#goalmmát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:%>X5jn#goalmmát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:%>n#goalmmát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:%>X4#goalmmát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:%>#goalmmát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:%>X5jn#goalmmát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:%>n#goalmmát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc:%>X4#goalmmát#logi%>s K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:%>X4#goalmmát#logi%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:%>#goalmmát#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:%>X4#goalmmát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:%>X5jn#goalmmát#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:%>#goalmmát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:%>#goalmmát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:%>#goalmmát#logi%>jde K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:%>X5jn#goalmmát#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:%>#goalmmát#logi%>jgujn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:%>#goalmmát#logi%>jn K ; !Nickel 91 from here downwards
 +Num+Pl+Attr:%>X4t#goalmmát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Attr:%>X5jd#goalmmát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Attr:%>X5jn#goalmmát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Nom:%>X4t#goalmmát#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:%>X5jd#goalmmát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen+Use/Sub:%>X5jd#goalmmát#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Use/Sub:%>X5jd#goalmmát#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Pl+Com+Use/Sub:%>X5jd#goalmmát#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Ess:%>X4t#goalmmát#logi%>n K ;

LEXICON GOLBMANJEALJATLOHKAI
 +Num+Sg+Nom:%>#njealját#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Ess:%>#njealját#lohki%>n K ;
 +Num+Ess:%>#njealját#logi%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:%>#njealját#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:%>X4#njealját#logi%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:%>X4#njealját#logi»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Attr:%>X4#njealját#lot»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Attr:%>X4#njealját#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:%>#njealját#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:%>X5jn#njealját#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:%>n#njealját#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:%>X4#njealját#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:%>#njealját#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:%>X5jn#njealját#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:%>n#njealját#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc:%>X4#njealját#logi%>s K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:%>X4#njealját#logi%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:%>#njealját#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:%>X4#njealját#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:%>X5jn#njealját#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:%>#njealját#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:%>#njealját#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:%>#njealját#logi%>jde K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:%>X5jn#njealját#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:%>#njealját#logi%>jgujn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:%>#njealját#logi%>jn K ; !Nickel 91 from here downwards
 +Num+Pl+Attr:%>X4t#njealját#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Attr:%>X5jd#njealját#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Attr:%>X5jn#njealját#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Nom:%>X4t#njealját#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:%>X5jd#njealját#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen+Use/Sub:%>X5jd#njealját#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Use/Sub:%>X5jd#njealját#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Pl+Com+Use/Sub:%>X5jd#njealját#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Ess:%>X4t#njealját#logi%>n K ;

LEXICON GOLBMAVIDATLOHKAI
 +Num+Sg+Nom:%>#viđát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Ess:%>#viđát#lohki%>n K ;
 +Num+Ess:%>#viđát#logi%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:%>#viđát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:%>X4#viđát#logi%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:%>X4#viđát#logi»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Attr:%>X4#viđát#lot»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Attr:%>X4#viđát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:%>#viđát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:%>X5jn#viđát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:%>n#viđát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:%>X4#viđát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:%>#viđát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:%>X5jn#viđát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:%>n#viđát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc:%>X4#viđát#logi%>s K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:%>X4#viđát#logi%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:%>#viđát#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:%>X4#viđát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:%>X5jn#viđát#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:%>#viđát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:%>#viđát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:%>#viđát#logi%>jde K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:%>X5jn#viđát#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:%>#viđát#logi%>jgujn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:%>#viđát#logi%>jn K ; !Nickel 91 from here downwards
 +Num+Pl+Attr:%>X4t#viđát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Attr:%>X5jd#viđát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Attr:%>X5jn#viđát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Nom:%>X4t#viđát#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:%>X5jd#viđát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen+Use/Sub:%>X5jd#viđát#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Use/Sub:%>X5jd#viđát#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Pl+Com+Use/Sub:%>X5jd#viđát#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Ess:%>X4t#viđát#logi%>n K ;

LEXICON GOLBMAGUDATLOHKAI
 +Num+Sg+Nom:%>#guđát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Ess:%>#guđát#lohki%>n K ;
 +Num+Ess:%>#guđát#logi%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:%>#guđát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:%>X4#guđát#logi%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:%>X4#guđát#logi»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Attr:%>X4#guđát#lot»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Attr:%>X4#guđát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:%>#guđát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:%>X5jn#guđát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:%>n#guđát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:%>X4#guđát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:%>#guđát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:%>X5jn#guđát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:%>n#guđát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc:%>X4#guđát#logi%>s K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:%>X4#guđát#logi%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:%>#guđát#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:%>X4#guđát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:%>X5jn#guđát#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:%>#guđát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:%>#guđát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:%>#guđát#logi%>jde K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:%>X5jn#guđát#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:%>#guđát#logi%>jgujn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:%>#guđát#logi%>jn K ; !Nickel 91 from here downwards
 +Num+Pl+Attr:%>X4t#guđát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Attr:%>X5jd#guđát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Attr:%>X5jn#guđát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Nom:%>X4t#guđát#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:%>X5jd#guđát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen+Use/Sub:%>X5jd#guđát#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Use/Sub:%>X5jd#guđát#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Pl+Com+Use/Sub:%>X5jd#guđát#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Ess:%>X4t#guđát#logi%>n K ;

LEXICON 11TO99F
golbma#nuppe#lohkái:golbma GOLBMANUPPELOHKAI ;
golbma#goalmmát#lohkái:golbma GOLBMAGOALMMATLOHKAI ;
golbma#njealját#lohkái:golbma GOLBMANJEALJATLOHKAI ;
golbma#viđát#lohkái:golbma GOLBMAVIDATLOHKAI ;
golbma#guđát#lohkái:golbma GOLBMAGUDATLOHKAI ;
LEXICON 111TO119
golbma#nuppe#lohkái:golbma GOLBMANUPPELOHKAI ;
golbma#goalmmát#lohkái:golbma GOLBMAGOALMMATLOHKAI ;
golbma#njealját#lohkái:golbma GOLBMANJEALJATLOHKAI ;
golbma#viđát#lohkái:golbma GOLBMAVIDATLOHKAI ;
golbma#guđát#lohkái:golbma GOLBMAGUDATLOHKAI ;
LEXICON num-imprecise
máŋ0ga#nuppe#lohkái:máŋ'ga GOLBMANUPPELOHKAI ;
